Massachusetts, session 194th, H915.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2G the following section:-
Section 2H. (a) It is hereby declared the policy of the commonwealth and the department
of conservation and recreation, in this section referred to as the department, to maximize access
to trails, outdoor spaces and outdoor recreational activities for people of all abilities, and to
advance equity for all residents of the commonwealth. This section shall be implemented to
achieve this goal.
(b) With respect to outdoor recreation under its jurisdiction, the department of fish and
game shall also work to maximize access to trails, outdoor spaces and outdoor recreational
activities for people of all abilities, and to advance equity for all residents of the commonwealth.
(c) The secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall
establish a Trail Access Working Group, hereafter referred to as the working group, to collect
of 6

and publish data, and advise the secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs and the commissioner of the department on the implementation of this section. The
working group shall include the secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs or a designee, who shall be the chair, and
(i) the director of the Universal Access Program of the department;
(ii) a representative of the department of fish and game;
(iii) the executive director of the Massachusetts office on disability;
(iv) a representative of the Massachusetts Association of Conservation Commissions;
(v) one or more representatives of organizations concerned with accessible outdoor
recreation;
(vi) one or more representatives of organizations concerned with the legal rights of
people with disabilities;
(vii) one or more representatives of organizations concerned with independent living for
people with disabilities;
(viii) one or more representatives of organizations concerned with the conservation of
public land;
(ix) one or more representatives of groups concerned with trails;
(x) no fewer than 3 representatives of cities and towns that have trails managed by the
department within their borders, including at least 1 city or town from no fewer than 3 different
counties, including a county that is predominantly rural and one that is predominantly urban;
of 6

(xi) a representative from an organization or company that designs and builds accessible
trails;
(xii) a representative from a regional planning agency that has experience with grant
opportunities and funding sources for accessible trails; and
(xiii) other persons identified by the commissioner as likely to make helpful contributions
to the working group; provided, that the working group shall have no less than one-third of its
members self-identify as having disabling conditions, and provided further, in making
appointments, the commissioner shall ensure that the task force represents diverse geographic
regions of the commonwealth and reflects racial and ethnic diversity.
(d) The Trail Access Working Group shall:
(i) review current access for people with disabilities to paved and unpaved trails in the
commonwealth;
(ii) review best practices, including federal guidelines such as from the United States
Forest Service, and the United States Access Board accessibility standards for federal outdoor
developed areas and recommendations from experts for how to expand access, including from
people with disabilities;
(iii) review requirements of state and federal law;
(iv) consider the impact of wetlands policy on the access to trails for people with
disabilities;
(v) appoint members to the Trail Access Advisory Council established in subsection (f)
of this section;
of 6

(vi) annually hold no fewer than 3 open public hearings in various regions of the state to
receive testimony from members of the public; and
(vii) file an annual report summarizing the findings of its reviews and making
comprehensive recommendations on ways to improve access to paved and unpaved trails for
people with mobility considerations. The recommendations may include a timeline for
implementation. If the working group believes there will be a cost to implementing its
recommendations, the report shall include an estimate of the cost for implementation and
possible funding sources that could be utilized for implementation.
(e) The working group shall file its report with the governor, the executive office of
energy and environmental affairs and the joint committee on environment and natural resources
and shall publish the report on the public website of the department.
(f) The secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall
establish a Trail Access Advisory Council, hereafter referred to as the council, to serve as a
public resource for trail accessibility, and to advise the secretary of the executive office of energy
and environmental affairs and the commissioner of the department on the implementation of the
recommendations and findings of the Trail Access Working Group. The council shall include the
secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs or a designee, who shall be
the chair, and
(i) individuals, designated by the Trail Access Working Group, who represent related
stakeholders and organizations; and
(ii) other persons identified by the commissioner as likely to make helpful contributions
to the advisory council; provided, that the council shall have no less than one-third of its
of 6

members self-identify as having disabling conditions, and provided further, in making
appointments, the commissioner shall ensure that the council represents diverse geographic
regions of the commonwealth and reflects racial and ethnic diversity.
(g) Members of the council shall be appointed for terms of 3 years or until a successor is
appointed. Members shall be eligible for reappointment. In the event of a vacancy, the secretary
of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall, within 60 days of the
occurrence of a vacancy, appoint a new member in accordance with subsection (f) to fulfill the
remainder of the unexpired term. The council may request administrative support from the
department.
(h) Council members may be eligible for compensation at a rate fixed by the council, as
approved by the chief financial officer of the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs to ensure appropriate funds are available to cover the costs. Council members shall be
eligible for compensation only to the extent otherwise permitted by chapter and upon providing
the necessary documentation required to process any such payment. Any request for
compensation shall be made by the council member to the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs within 30 days of being incurred. Requests made after this time may be
ineligible for payment.
(i) The council shall:
(i) make recommendations to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs on
all matters of policy related to accessibility of trails and outdoor recreation for people with
disabilities, including, but not limited to, the implementation of findings of the Trail Access
Working Group;
of 6

(ii) serve as a resource for municipalities and members of the public on matters related to
universally accessible trail design and construction. The council shall hold public hearings and
100 informational events as requested; and
101 (iii) file an annual report of its findings, conclusions, proposals, recommendations and
102 progress towards reaching the recommendations described in the Trail Access Working Group’s
103 final report.
104 (j) The council shall file its report with the governor, the secretary of the executive office
105 of energy and environmental affairs and the joint committee on environment and natural
106 resources and shall publish the report on the public website of the department.
107 (k) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
108 fund, to be administered by the secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental
109 affairs, which shall be known as the Massachusetts Trail Access Fund. The Fund shall consist of
110 all revenues from public and private sources including, but not limited to, appropriations, gifts,
111 grants, donations, reimbursements from the federal government and grants-in-aid or other
112 receipts to further the purposes of the Fund in accordance with this section.
113 SECTION 2. (a) Members of the Trail Access Advisory Council established in section
114 2H of chapter 21 of the General Laws, as inserted by this act, shall be appointed no later than 3
115 months after the effective date of this act.
116 (b) The initial report and recommendations of the Trails Access Advisory Council shall
117 be filed no later than 12 months after the initial meeting of the council.
of 6